Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3062.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5404XC (2) 91 jm/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 123.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 4A. âAmerican breweryâ means the land 3 and buildings located in the United States where beer is 4 manufactured and stored. 5 NEW SUBSECTION . 19B. âForeign import beerâ means beer 6 manufactured and imported from outside of the United States. 7 Sec. 2. Section 123.136, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 8 to read as follows: 9 1. In addition to the annual permit fee to be paid by all 10 class âAâ beer permittees under this chapter , there shall 11 be levied and collected from the permittees on all beer 12 manufactured for sale or sold in this state at wholesale and 13 on all beer imported into this state for sale at wholesale and 14 sold in this state at wholesale, and from special class âAâ 15 beer permittees on all beer manufactured for consumption on the 16 premises and on all beer sold at retail at the manufacturing 17 premises for consumption off the premises pursuant to section 18 123.130, subsection 4 , a tax of one and eighty-six hundredths 19 dollars for every barrel containing thirty-one gallons of beer 20 manufactured in an American brewery and a tax of five and 21 eighty-nine hundredths dollars for every barrel containing 22 thirty-one gallons of foreign import beer , and at a like rate 23 for any other quantity or for the fractional part of a barrel. 24 However, no tax shall be levied or collected on beer shipped 25 outside this state by a class âAâ beer permittee or special 26 class âAâ beer permittee or on beer sold to a class âAâ beer 27 permittee by a special class âAâ beer permittee or another 28 class âAâ beer permittee. 29